Maryland, session 2026, HB1009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
3–104.
(a) (1) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
clerk of the circuit court may record an instrument that effects a change of ownership if the
instrument is:
(i) Endorsed with the certificate of the collector of taxes of the
county in which the property is assessed, required under subsection (b) of this section;
(ii) 1. Accompanied by a complete intake sheet; or
2. Endorsed by the assessment office for the county as
provided in subsection (g)(8) of this section; and
(iii) Accompanied by a copy of the instrument, and any survey, for
submission to the Department of Assessments and Taxation.
(2) The Supervisor of Assessments shall transfer ownership of property in
the assessment records, effective as of the date of recordation, on receipt from the clerk of
the circuit court of a copy of the instrument, the completed intake sheet, and any survey
submitted under paragraph (1) of this subsection or documents received through an
electronic recordation system.
(3) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO THE RECORDATION
OF AN INSTRUMENT THAT EFFECTS A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP FROM THE UNITED
STATES TO:
1. THE UNITED STATES OR A PUBLIC
INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE UNITED STATES;
2. THE STATE;

HOUSE BILL 1009 3
3. A COUNTY, A MUNICIPAL CORPORATION, OR ANY
OTHER POLITICAL SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;
4. A PUBLIC INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE STATE; OR
5. ANY GOVERNMENTAL UNIT OF THE STATE.
(II) THE CLERK OF THE CIRCUIT COURT MAY NOT RECORD AN
INSTRUMENT THAT EFFECTS A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP OF PROPERTY FROM THE
UNITED STATES TO ANOTHER PERSON UNLESS THE INSTRUMENT IS ACCOMPANIED
BY A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–104.3 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
3–104.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE” MEANS A CERTIFICATE ISSUED
BY THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT CERTIFYING THAT A CHANGE OF
OWNERSHIP, AND ANY RELATED INSTRUMENT THAT EFFECTS THE CHANGE,
COMPLIES WITH ALL APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS.
(3) “DEPARTMENT” MEANS THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION.
(4) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(5) “REQUEST FORM” MEANS A FORM PROVIDED BY THE OFFICE AND
THE DEPARTMENT THAT A PARTY TO A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP USES TO REQUEST
A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF
COMPLIANCE FOR AN INSTRUMENT THAT EFFECTS A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP OF
REAL PROPERTY FROM THE UNITED STATES TO ANOTHER PERSON IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 3–104(A)(3) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) TO REQUEST A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE, A PARTY TO A
CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP SHALL SUBMIT:
(I) A COMPLETED REQUEST FORM TO THE OFFICE AND THE
DEPARTMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1009
(II) ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE OFFICE AND THE
DEPARTMENT REQUIRE.
(2) (I) ON RECEIPT OF A COMPLETED REQUEST FORM, THE
OFFICE, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL REVIEW THE CHANGE
OF OWNERSHIP AND THE RELATED INSTRUMENT THAT EFFECTS THE CHANGE FOR
COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE STATE AND FEDERAL LAWS, RULES, AND
REGULATIONS.
(II) DURING A REVIEW UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT MAY REQUEST ADDITIONAL
INFORMATION FROM ANY PARTY TO THE CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP.
(3) (I) AFTER COMPLETING THE REVIEW UNDER PARAGRAPH (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DETERMINE
WHETHER TO:
1. ISSUE A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE;
2. DENY THE REQUEST FOR THE CERTIFICATE OF
COMPLIANCE; OR
3. REQUEST ADDITIONAL INFORMATION FROM ONE OR
MORE PARTIES TO THE CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP.
(II) THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PROVIDE A
DETERMINATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IN WRITING TO
THE PARTY THAT SUBMITTED THE REQUEST FORM.
(III) A DENIAL UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH
SHALL PROVIDE THE REASONS AND LEGAL BASIS FOR THE DENIAL.
(4) IF A REQUEST IS DENIED, A PARTY MAY RESUBMIT A REQUEST
FORM TO THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT AFTER CORRECTING ALL
DEFICIENCIES IDENTIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3)(III) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) DEVELOP A STANDARDIZED REQUEST FORM;
(2) MAKE THE REQUEST FORM PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON THE
RESPECTIVE WEBSITES OF THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT; AND

HOUSE BILL 1009 5
(3) ESTABLISH STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR:
(I) THE RECEIPT AND PROCESSING OF REQUEST FORMS;
(II) THE LEGAL REVIEW OF CHANGES OF OWNERSHIP AND
RELATED INSTRUMENTS THAT ARE SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION; AND
(III) THE ISSUANCE OF CERTIFICATES OF COMPLIANCE.
(E) (1) THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH FEES FOR:
(I) THE REVIEW OF A CHANGE OF OWNERSHIP UNDER
SUBSECTION (C)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE ISSUANCE OF A CERTIFICATE OF COMPLIANCE.
(2) THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE FEES
UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION IN AN AMOUNT THAT IS SUFFICIENT
TO PAY THE COSTS OF CARRYING OUT THIS SECTION.
(3) THE FEES COLLECTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE
DEPOSITED IN THE GENERAL FUND OF THE STATE.
(F) THE CLERK OF EACH CIRCUIT COURT, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE
ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS, SHALL ESTABLISH UNIFORM STATEWIDE
PROCEDURES TO RECEIVE AND RECORD CERTIFICATES OF COMPLIANCE ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(G) THE OFFICE AND THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO
IMPLEMENT THIS SECTION.
Article – Tax – Property
13–203.
(a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (a–1) [and], (b), AND (C) of this
section, the rate of the transfer tax is 0.5% of the consideration payable for the instrument
of writing.
(2) The consideration:
(i) includes the amount of any mortgage or deed of trust assumed
by the grantee; and

HOUSE BILL 1009
(ii) subject to item (i) of this paragraph, includes only the amount
paid or delivered in return for the sale of the property and does not include the amount of
any debt forgiven or no longer secured by a mortgage or deed of trust on the property.
(C) (1) THE RATE OF THE TRANSFER TAX IS 2% OF THE VALUE OF THE
REAL PROPERTY DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT AT THE DATE OF FINALITY
IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE DATE OF TRANSFER FOR AN INSTRUMENT OF
WRITING THAT CONVEYS TITLE TO REAL PROPERTY IF:
(I) THE UNITED STATES WAS THE MOST RECENT TITLE
HOLDER OF THE REAL PROPERTY BEFORE THE PERSON CONVEYING TITLE TO THE
REAL PROPERTY; AND
(II) THE TITLE FROM THE UNITED STATES UNDER ITEM (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH WAS CONVEYED ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2026.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, THE
TRANSFER TAX UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE PAID ENTIRELY BY THE
TRANSFEROR.
13–209.
(a) (1) Before any other distribution under this section, in any fiscal year that
bonds secured by a pledge of the State transfer tax are outstanding, the revenue from the
transfer tax shall be used to pay, as and when due, the principal of and interest on the
bonds.
(2) The Department shall deduct the cost of administering the transfer tax
from the taxes collected under this title and credit those revenues to the fund established
under § 1–203.3 of the Corporations and Associations Article.
(3) (I) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection AND
SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, after deducting the revenues
required under paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, the revenue from transfer tax is
payable to the Comptroller for deposit in a special fund.
(II) BEFORE DEPOSITING THE REMAINING TRANSFER TAX
REVENUE IN A SPECIAL FUND UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMPTROLLER SHALL CREDIT THE TRANSFER TAX REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO
THE TRANSFER TAX RATE UNDER § 13–203(C) TO THE PURPOSES SPECIFIED IN
TITLE 5, SUBTITLE 9 OF THE NATURAL RESOURCES ARTICLE (PROGRAM OPEN
SPACE).

HOUSE BILL 1009 7
(4) In any fiscal year in which transfer tax revenue is used to pay debt
service on outstanding bonds under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the distribution of
revenues in the special fund under this section and as specified in § 5–903(a)(2)(i)1A of the
Natural Resources Article, for State land acquisition, or to the Agricultural Land
Preservation Fund to the extent any debt service is attributable to that Fund, shall be
reduced by an amount equal to the debt service for the fiscal year.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to instruments of writing recorded on or after July 1, 2026.